District of Columbia statutes.
42-2605

Annual audit; report to Congress and Council; appropriations.

(a)

An annual audit of the operations of the Fund shall be conducted by the Office of the Inspector General of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Not later than 6 months after the end of each fiscal year, the Mayor shall submit to the Congress of the United States and to the Council of the District of Columbia a report of the financial condition of the Fund and the results of the operations for such fiscal year.

(c)

The Mayor shall include in the budget estimates of the District of Columbia for each fiscal year, and there is authorized to be appropriated annually, such amounts out of the revenues of the District of Columbia as may be required for the Fund.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-103, § 6, 25 DCR 1977
Oct. 24, 1981, D.C. Law 4-44, § 2(e), 28 DCR 4265

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2205.
1973 Ed., § 45-1805.

Mayor's Orders

Office of Internal Audits and Inspections abolished: The District of Columbia Office of Internal Audits and Inspections was replaced by Mayor’s Order 79-7, dated January 2, 1979, and Mayor’s Order 79-224, dated September 24, 1979, which Orders established the Office of the Inspection General of the District of Columbia.